dictionaries/be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 шчыцкіх .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 0 шчыцкія .
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 0 нту .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 0 нты .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 нах .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 наю .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 ная .
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 0 вальшчыцамі .
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 0 наў .
SFX 1789 Y 1
SFX 1789 0 чах .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 чаю .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 чая .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 чаў .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 рскага .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 льна .
SFX 3799 Y 1
SFX 3799 0 водствам .
SFX 2449 Y 1
SFX 2449 0 ўнае .
SFX 2448 Y 1
SFX 2448 0 ўнай .
SFX 3811 Y 1
SFX 3811 0 арскаму .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 0 са .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 се .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 ск .
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 0 нута .
SFX 2871 Y 1
SFX 2871 0 вік .
SFX 3936 Y 1
SFX 3936 0 вім .
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 0 авіком .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 істах .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 істаю .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 істая .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 0 істаў .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 рнымі .
SFX 4154 Y 1
SFX 4154 0 аграфічнаю .
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 0 аграфічная .
SFX 4246 Y 1
SFX 4246 0 нікавым .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 етра .
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 0 нялі .
SFX 4665 Y 1
SFX 4665 0 будаўнік .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 мала .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 жны .
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 0 нную .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 ыўся .
SFX 3131 Y 1
SFX 3131 0 ернымі .
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 0 біце .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 емся .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 алагічны .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 ткамі .
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 0 аўшчына .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 аўшчыне .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 знаўчае .
SFX 4634 Y 1
SFX 4634 0 знаўчай .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 ванаму .
SFX 3475 Y 1
SFX 3475 0 ліш .
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 0 ліў .
SFX 3125 Y 1
SFX 3125 0 злі .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 енне .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 0 іруе .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 іруй .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 аванаму .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 гадовымі .
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 0 ынай .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 ынам .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 раць .
SFX 4776 Y 1
SFX 4776 0 ліцца .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ленага .
SFX 4081 Y 1
SFX 4081 0 йкам .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 альна .
SFX 4418 Y 1
SFX 4418 0 кавалі .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 раюся .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 тую .
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 0 ненню .
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 0 нення .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 ненні .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 0 цкі .
SFX 3299 Y 1
SFX 3299 0 тавым .
SFX 4662 Y 1
SFX 4662 0 будаўнікамі .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 рскую .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 іну .
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 0 іны .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 завацца .
SFX 4079 Y 1
SFX 4079 0 каецеся .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 оўвае .
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 0 оўвай .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 цыйным .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 ліваму .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 джваем .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 адзілі .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 дах .
SFX 2303 Y 1
SFX 2303 0 даю .
SFX 1956 Y 1
SFX 1956 0 даў .
SFX 3677 Y 1
SFX 3677 0 леце .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 0 оўкамі .
SFX 2416 Y 1
SFX 2416 0 заваў .
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 0 шацца .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 ападобнымі .
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 0 авіку .
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 0 авікі .
SFX 4653 Y 1
SFX 4653 0 вальшчыца .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 ляецца .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 водам .
SFX 3342 Y 1
SFX 3342 0 льшчыцай .
SFX 3341 Y 1
SFX 3341 0 льшчыцам .
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 0 ьскіх .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 ьскія .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 ваюся .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 дзіцца .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 йся .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 аемся .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 уся .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 0 ліваеце .
SFX 3814 Y 1
SFX 3814 0 арскага .
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 0 чках .
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 0 чкаю .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 тэрапію .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 тэрапія .
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 0 тэрапіі .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 анку .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 анкі .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 ьвайце .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 ьванне .
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 0 ыстка .
SFX 1853 Y 1
SFX 1853 0 авальнаю .
SFX 1852 Y 1
SFX 1852 0 авальная .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 зе .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 зм .
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 0 віку .
SFX 3387 Y 1
SFX 3387 0 вікі .
SFX 2335 Y 1
SFX 2335 0 нутымі .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 льшчыка .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 рны .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 кне .
SFX 3931 Y 1
SFX 3931 0 гаюць .
SFX 4654 Y 1
SFX 4654 0 вальшчыц .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 істкай .
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 0 істкам .
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 0 нных .
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 0 нныя .
SFX 4766 Y 1
SFX 4766 0 нікавую .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 авою .
SFX 3998 Y 1
SFX 3998 0 шваеш .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 ічны .
SFX 4869 Y 1
SFX 4869 0 вела .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 ванага .
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 0 пала .
SFX 4561 Y 1
SFX 4561 0 слі .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 завана .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 ўшчыну .
SFX 3166 Y 1
SFX 3166 0 ўшчыны .
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 0 оідамі .
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 0 шчах .
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 0 шчаў .
SFX 4049 Y 1
SFX 4049 0 райцеся .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 свалі .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 аванага .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 джваюць .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 сцкую .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 лілі .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 тнаму .
SFX 3560 Y 1
SFX 3560 0 кваеш .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 рамі .
SFX 3975 Y 1
SFX 3975 0 ыстымі .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 іяю .
SFX 2082 Y 1
SFX 2082 0 ачках .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 ачкаю .
SFX 3892 Y 1
SFX 3892 0 льніца .
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 тых .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 тыя .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 ваўшыся .
SFX 3311 Y 1
SFX 3311 0 ствуе .
SFX 4366 Y 1
SFX 4366 0 ствуй .
SFX 3434 Y 1
SFX 3434 0 оўшчыкам .
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 0 ючых .
SFX 4886 Y 1
SFX 4886 0 ючыя .
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 0 чыла .
SFX 4030 Y 1
SFX 4030 0 ўшчыкам .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 лівага .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 чкамі .
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 0 алагічнаму .
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 0 раннем .
SFX 4670 Y 1
SFX 4670 0 асу .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 ася .
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 0 ацыйным .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 тавую .
SFX 3317 Y 1
SFX 3317 0 оўвайце .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 0 авічам .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 будаўнікоў .
SFX 4013 Y 1
SFX 4013 0 цыйную .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 шчыцу .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 шчыцы .
SFX 3893 Y 1
SFX 3893 0 льніц .
SFX 4440 Y 1
SFX 4440 0 етрычным .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 кавымі .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 ўкамі .
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 0 тара .
SFX 3711 Y 1
SFX 3711 0 ізаванаму .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 кацца .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 еру .
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 0 еры .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 ыстках .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 ысткаю .
SFX 4792 Y 1
SFX 4792 0 йкамі .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 ачку .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 ачкі .
SFX 3374 Y 1
SFX 3374 0 ізаваць .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 0 ём .
SFX 3081 Y 1
SFX 3081 0 уемся .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 льны .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 скімі .
SFX 2446 Y 1
SFX 2446 0 ўнаю .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 ўная .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 ст .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 су .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 сы .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 сь .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 ся .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 сі .
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 0 нуты .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 віч .
SFX 3935 Y 1
SFX 3935 0 віш .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 віў .
SFX 2586 Y 1
SFX 2586 0 авікоў .
SFX 3025 Y 1
SFX 3025 0 нецеся .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 арамі .
SFX 4781 Y 1
SFX 4781 0 куйце .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 ннае .
SFX 1427 Y 1
SFX 1427 0 ннай .
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 0 знаўства .
SFX 3380 Y 1
SFX 3380 0 знаўстве .
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 0 нікавых .
SFX 4397 Y 1
SFX 4397 0 нікавыя .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 етру .
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 0 етры .
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 0 малі .
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 0 чваннем .
SFX 4595 Y 1
SFX 4595 0 нікавае .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 нікавай .
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 0 яеце .
SFX 3598 Y 1
SFX 3598 0 біць .
SFX 4365 Y 1
SFX 4365 0 ствуйце .
SFX 4316 Y 1
SFX 4316 0 шуся .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 аўшчыну .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 аўшчыны .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 знаўчаю .
SFX 4631 Y 1
SFX 4631 0 знаўчая .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 0 ліва .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 тнага .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 0 атара .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 іце .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 насць .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 насцю .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 насці .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 0 мым .
SFX 3485 Y 1
SFX 3485 0 енню .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 ення .
SFX 3486 Y 1
SFX 3486 0 енні .
SFX 3038 Y 1
SFX 3038 0 ірую .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 ўшы .
SFX 4897 Y 1
SFX 4897 0 ынах .
SFX 4170 Y 1
SFX 4170 0 ынаю .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 ляецеся .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 аннямі .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 тае .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 тай .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 так .
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 там .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 0 рскае .
SFX 2327 Y 1
SFX 2327 0 рскай .
SFX 4791 Y 1
SFX 4791 0 йках .
SFX 3362 Y 1
SFX 3362 0 ісцкімі .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 алагічнага .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 лівала .
SFX 4130 Y 1
SFX 4130 0 днаму .
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 0 альны .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 аючы .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 ляюся .
SFX 4614 Y 1
SFX 4614 0 кваючы .
SFX 4995 Y 1
SFX 4995 0 лецца .
SFX 3297 Y 1
SFX 3297 0 тавых .
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 0 тавыя .
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 0 чанаму .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 хваеце .
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 0 оўваю .
SFX 3188 Y 1
SFX 3188 0 оўваў .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 цыйных .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 цыйныя .
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 0 джваеш .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 чанага .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 аваць .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 ацыйную .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 0 руеце .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 ізаванага .
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 0 вальшчыцу .
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 0 вальшчыцы .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 чнаму .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 ура .
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 0 водах .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 0 водаў .
SFX 4442 Y 1
SFX 4442 0 етрычную .
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 0 льшчыцах .
SFX 3338 Y 1
SFX 3338 0 льшчыцаю .
SFX 3667 Y 1
SFX 3667 0 нцамі .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 істымі .
SFX 4381 Y 1
SFX 4381 0 оўваюцца .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 ізавацца .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 аным .
SFX 2447 Y 1
SFX 2447 0 ўнаму .
SFX 2994 Y 1
SFX 2994 0 раліся .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 йцеся .
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 0 лькай .
SFX 3474 Y 1
SFX 3474 0 лькам .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 ваць .
SFX 2876 Y 1
SFX 2876 0 ьванню .
SFX 2875 Y 1
SFX 2875 0 ьвання .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 ьванні .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 0 ыстку .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 ысткі .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 ства .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 0 стве .
SFX 2224 Y 1
SFX 2224 0 зу .
SFX 4806 Y 1
SFX 4806 0 зы .
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 0 зь .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 зі .
SFX 4385 Y 1
SFX 4385 0 оўвалася .
SFX 2564 Y 1
SFX 2564 0 льшчыку .
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 0 льшчыкі .
SFX 3221 Y 1
SFX 3221 0 кну .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 кні .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 ваму .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 вамі .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 ьней .
SFX 2192 Y 1
SFX 2192 0 істках .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 істкаю .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 арнаму .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 0 ска .
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 0 знаўствам .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 сным .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 велі .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 цкімі .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 іліся .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 палі .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 аванне .
SFX 2952 Y 1
SFX 2952 0 заваны .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 мымі .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 сцкае .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 сцкай .
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 0 рала .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 оідам .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 ерамі .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 ычным .
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 0 ваннямі .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 зіце .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 ызмам .
SFX 3919 Y 1
SFX 3919 0 днага .
SFX 3690 Y 1
SFX 3690 0 іраванымі .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 ованаму .
SFX 3793 Y 1
SFX 3793 0 джана .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 мую .
SFX 2568 Y 1
SFX 2568 0 льшчыкамі .
SFX 1177 Y 1
SFX 1177 0 ара .
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 0 дзе .
SFX 3886 Y 1
SFX 3886 0 льніцу .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 льніцы .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 ізацыяй .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 тавае .
SFX 3417 Y 1
SFX 3417 0 тавай .
SFX 3307 Y 1
SFX 3307 0 ствую .
SFX 3431 Y 1
SFX 3431 0 оўшчыках .
SFX 3432 Y 1
SFX 3432 0 оўшчыкаў .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 чылі .
SFX 4028 Y 1
SFX 4028 0 ўшчыках .
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 0 цыйнае .
SFX 4017 Y 1
SFX 4017 0 цыйнай .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 наўся .
SFX 3232 Y 1
SFX 3232 0 ацыйных .
SFX 3231 Y 1
SFX 3231 0 ацыйныя .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 азнаўства .
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 0 азнаўстве .
